apertium-sv-da/apertium-sv-da.da.dix
    <pardef n="n/ummer__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>umre</l>
          <r>ummer<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="indef"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ummeret</l>
          <r>ummer<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>r.</l>
          <r>ummer<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="indef"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ummer</l>
          <r>ummer<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="indef"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="postn/ummer__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>r.</l>
          <r>ummer<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="indef"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ummer</l>
          <r>ummer<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="indef"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="sek/und__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r>und<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="indef"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>.</l>
          <r>und<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="indef"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>under</l>
          <r>und<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="indef"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>und</l>
          <r>und<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="indef"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="fig/ur__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>urer</l>
          <r>ur<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="indef"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r>ur<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="indef"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="min/ut__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>utters</l>
          <r>ut<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="indef"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>.</l>
          <r>ut<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="indef"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>utter</l>
          <r>ut<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="indef"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>utterne</l>
          <r>ut<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="indef"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>uts</l>
          <r>ut<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="indef"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ut</l>
          <r>ut<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="indef"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="st/ykke__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ykker</l>
          <r>ykke<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="indef"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ykket</l>
          <r>ykke<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>k.</l>
          <r>ykke<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="indef"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ykke</l>
          <r>ykke<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="indef"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ha/ve__vbhar">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>avde</l>
          <r>ve<s n="vbhar"/><s n="da"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ve</l>
          <r>ve<s n="vbhar"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ft</l>
          <r>ve<s n="vbhar"/><s n="part"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>r</l>
          <r>ve<s n="vbhar"/><s n="prs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="anklagede__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="da"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="samle__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>de</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="da"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>des</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="da"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>t</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="part"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>r</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="danne__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>de</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="da"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>des</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="da"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>t</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="part"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>r</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="drukne__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>de</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="da"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="aflevere__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>de</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="da"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>t</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="part"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="benytte__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>de</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="da"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>t</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="part"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>r</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="hente__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>de</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="da"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>r</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="anbefale__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>de</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="da"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>r</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

      <e>
        <i>fig</i>
        <par n="fig/ur__n"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>min</i>
        <par n="min/ut__n"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>n</i>
        <par n="n/ummer__n"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>postn</i>
        <par n="postn/ummer__n"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>sek</i>
        <par n="sek/und__n"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>st</i>
        <par n="st/ykke__n"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>ha</i>
        <par n="ha/ve__vbhar"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>aflevere</i>
        <par n="aflevere__vblex"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>anbefale</i>
        <par n="anbefale__vblex"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>anklagede</l>
          <r>anklage</r>
        </p>
        <par n="anklagede__vblex"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>benytte</i>
        <par n="benytte__vblex"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>besejrede</l>
          <r>besejre</r>
        </p>
        <par n="anklagede__vblex"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>danne</i>
        <par n="danne__vblex"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>drukne</i>
        <par n="drukne__vblex"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>flygte</i>
        <par n="drukne__vblex"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>forene</i>
        <par n="drukne__vblex"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>hente</i>
        <par n="hente__vblex"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>plyndrede</l>
          <r>plyndre</r>
        </p>
        <par n="anklagede__vblex"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>samle</i>
        <par n="samle__vblex"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>savede</l>
          <r>save</r>
        </p>
        <par n="anklagede__vblex"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>sejle</i>
        <par n="benytte__vblex"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>sparke</i>
        <par n="aflevere__vblex"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>sukkede</l>
          <r>sukke</r>
        </p>
        <par n="anklagede__vblex"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tav</l>
          <r>tie</r>
        </p>
        <par n="anklagede__vblex"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>undertegnede</l>
          <r>undertegne</r>
        </p>
        <par n="anklagede__vblex"/>
      </e>
